Texas statutes.
PENAL CODE

TITLE 3. PUNISHMENTS

CHAPTER 12. PUNISHMENTS

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 12.01. PUNISHMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH CODE. (a) A person adjudged guilty of an offense under this code shall be punished in accordance with this chapter and the Code of Criminal Procedure.

(b) Penal laws enacted after the effective date of this code shall be classified for punishment purposes in accordance with this chapter.

(c) This chapter does not deprive a court of authority conferred by law to forfeit property, dissolve a corporation, suspend or cancel a license or permit, remove a person from office, cite for contempt, or impose any other civil penalty. The civil penalty may be included in the sentence.

Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 883, ch. 399, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1974. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 900, Sec. 1.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1994.

Sec. 12.02. CLASSIFICATION OF OFFENSES. Offenses are designated as felonies or misdemeanors.

Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 883, ch. 399, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1974. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 900, Sec. 1.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1994.

Sec. 12.03. CLASSIFICATION OF MISDEMEANORS. (a) Misdemeanors are classified according to the relative seriousness of the offense into three categories:

(1) Class A misdemeanors;

(2) Class B misdemeanors;

(3) Class C misdemeanors.

(b) An offense designated a misdemeanor in this code without specification as to punishment or category is a Class C misdemeanor.

(c) Conviction of a Class C misdemeanor does not impose any legal disability or disadvantage.

Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 883, ch. 399, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1974. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 900, Sec. 1.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1994.

Sec. 12.04. CLASSIFICATION OF FELONIES. (a) Felonies are classified according to the relative seriousness of the offense into five categories:

(1) capital felonies;

(2) felonies of the first degree;

(3) felonies of the second degree;

(4) felonies of the third degree; and

(5) state jail felonies.

(b) An offense designated a felony in this code without specification as to category is a state jail felony.

Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 883, ch. 399, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1974. Amended by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 1125, ch. 426, art. 2, Sec. 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1974; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 900, Sec. 1.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1994.

SUBCHAPTER B. ORDINARY MISDEMEANOR PUNISHMENTS

Sec. 12.21. CLASS A MISDEMEANOR. An individual adjudged guilty of a Class A misdemeanor shall be punished by:

(1) a fine not to exceed $4,000;

(2) confinement in jail for a term not to exceed one year; or

(3) both such fine and confinement.

Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 883, ch. 399, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1974. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 108, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 900, Sec. 1.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1994.

Sec. 12.22. CLASS B MISDEMEANOR. An individual adjudged guilty of a Class B misdemeanor shall be punished by:

(1) a fine not to exceed $2,000;

(2) confinement in jail for a term not to exceed 180 days; or

(3) both such fine and confinement.

Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 883, ch. 399, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1974. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 108, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 900, Sec. 1.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1994.

Sec. 12.23. CLASS C MISDEMEANOR. An individual adjudged guilty of a Class C misdemeanor shall be punished by a fine not to exceed $500.

Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 883, ch. 399, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1974. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 108, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 900, Sec. 1.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1994.

SUBCHAPTER C. ORDINARY FELONY PUNISHMENTS

Sec. 12.31. CAPITAL FELONY. (a) An individual adjudged guilty of a capital felony in a case in which the state seeks the death penalty shall be punished by imprisonment in the Texas Department of Criminal Justice for life without parole or by death. An individual adjudged guilty of a capital felony in a case in which the state does not seek the death penalty shall be punished by imprisonment in the Texas Department of Criminal Justice for:

(1) life, if the individual committed the offense when younger than 18 years of age; or

(2) life without parole, if the individual committed the offense when 18 years of age or older.

(b) In a capital felony trial in which the state seeks the death penalty, prospective jurors shall be informed that a sentence of life imprisonment without parole or death is mandatory on conviction of a capital felony. In a capital felony trial in which the state does not seek the death penalty, prospective jurors shall be informed that the state is not seeking the death penalty and that:

(1) a sentence of life imprisonment is mandatory on conviction of the capital felony, if the individual committed the offense when younger than 18 years of age; or

(2) a sentence of life imprisonment without parole is mandatory on conviction of the capital felony, if the individual committed the offense when 18 years of age or older.

Added by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 1124, ch. 426, art. 2, Sec. 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1974. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 652, Sec. 12, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 838, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 900, Sec. 1.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1994.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 787 (S.B. 60), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 25.145, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (S.B. 839), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 2, Sec. 1, eff. July 22, 2013.

Sec. 12.32. FIRST DEGREE FELONY PUNISHMENT. (a) An individual adjudged guilty of a felony of the first degree shall be punished by imprisonment in the Texas Department of Criminal Justice for life or for any term of not more than 99 years or less than 5 years.

(b) In addition to imprisonment, an individual adjudged guilty of a felony of the first degree may be punished by a fine not to exceed $10,000.

Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 883, ch. 399, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1974. Renumbered from Penal Code Sec. 12.31 by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 1124, ch. 426, art. 2, Sec. 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1974. Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 1058, ch. 488, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1979; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 900, Sec. 1.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1994.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 25.146, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 12.33. SECOND DEGREE FELONY PUNISHMENT. (a) An individual adjudged guilty of a felony of the second degree shall be punished by imprisonment in the Texas Department of Criminal Justice for any term of not more than 20 years or less than 2 years.

(b) In addition to imprisonment, an individual adjudged guilty of a felony of the second degree may be punished by a fine not to exceed $10,000.

Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 883, ch. 399, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1974. Renumbered from Penal Code Sec. 12.32 by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 1124, ch. 426, art. 2, Sec. 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1974. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 900, Sec. 1.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1994.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 25.147, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 12.34. THIRD DEGREE FELONY PUNISHMENT. (a) An individual adjudged guilty of a felony of the third degree shall be punished by imprisonment in the Texas Department of Criminal Justice for any term of not more than 10 years or less than 2 years.

(b) In addition to imprisonment, an individual adjudged guilty of a felony of the third degree may be punished by a fine not to exceed $10,000.

Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 883, ch. 399, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1974. Renumbered from Penal Code Sec. 12.33 by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 1124, ch. 426, art. 2, Sec. 2, eff. Jan. 1,1974. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 785, Sec. 4.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1990, 71st Leg., 6th C.S., ch. 25, Sec. 7, eff. June 18, 1990; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 900, Sec. 1.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1994.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 25.148, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 12.35. STATE JAIL FELONY PUNISHMENT. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (c), an individual adjudged guilty of a state jail felony shall be punished by confinement in a state jail for any term of not more than two years or less than 180 days.

(b) In addition to confinement, an individual adjudged guilty of a state jail felony may be punished by a fine not to exceed $10,000.

(c) An individual adjudged guilty of a state jail felony shall be punished for a third degree felony if it is shown on the trial of the offense that:

(1) a deadly weapon as defined by Section 1.07 was used or exhibited during the commission of the offense or during immediate flight following the commission of the offense, and that the individual used or exhibited the deadly weapon or was a party to the offense and knew that a deadly weapon would be used or exhibited; or

(2) the individual has previously been finally convicted of any felony:

(A) under Section 21.02 or listed in Article 42A.054(a), Code of Criminal Procedure; or

(B) for which the judgment contains an affirmative finding under Article 42A.054(c) or (d), Code of Criminal Procedure.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 900, Sec. 1.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1994.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 593 (H.B. 8), Sec. 3.48, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 122 (H.B. 3000), Sec. 13, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 770 (H.B. 2299), Sec. 2.81, eff. January 1, 2017.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 768 (H.B. 4595), Sec. 17.001, eff. September 1, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER D. EXCEPTIONAL SENTENCES

Sec. 12.41. CLASSIFICATION OF OFFENSES OUTSIDE THIS CODE. For purposes of this subchapter, any conviction not obtained from a prosecution under this code shall be classified as follows:

(1) "felony of the third degree" if imprisonment in the Texas Department of Criminal Justice or another penitentiary is affixed to the offense as a possible punishment;

(2) "Class B misdemeanor" if the offense is not a felony and confinement in a jail is affixed to the offense as a possible punishment;

(3) "Class C misdemeanor" if the offense is punishable by fine only.

Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 883, ch. 399, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1974. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 900, Sec. 1.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1994.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 25.149, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 12.42. PENALTIES FOR REPEAT AND HABITUAL FELONY OFFENDERS ON TRIAL FOR FIRST, SECOND, OR THIRD DEGREE FELONY. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (c)(2), if it is shown on the trial of a felony of the third degree that the defendant has previously been finally convicted of a felony other than a state jail felony punishable under Section 12.35(a), on conviction the defendant shall be punished for a felony of the second degree.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (c)(2) or (c)(4), if it is shown on the trial of a felony of the second degree that the defendant has previously been finally convicted of a felony other than a state jail felony punishable under Section 12.35(a), on conviction the defendant shall be punished for a felony of the first degree.

(c)(1) If it is shown on the trial of a felony of the first degree that the defendant has previously been finally convicted of a felony other than a state jail felony punishable under Section 12.35(a), on conviction the defendant shall be punished by imprisonment in the Texas Department of Criminal Justice for life, or for any term of not more than 99 years or less than 15 years. In addition to imprisonment, an individual may be punished by a fine not to exceed $10,000.

(2) Notwithstanding Subdivision (1), a defendant shall be punished by imprisonment in the Texas Department of Criminal Justice for life if:

(A) the defendant is convicted of an offense:

(i) under Section 20A.02(a)(7) or (8), 21.11(a)(1), 22.021, or 22.011, Penal Code;

(ii) under Section 20.04(a)(4), Penal Code, if the defendant committed the offense with the intent to violate or abuse the victim sexually; or

(iii) under Section 30.02, Penal Code, punishable under Subsection (d) of that section, if the defendant committed the offense with the intent to commit a felony described by Subparagraph (i) or (ii) or a felony under Section 21.11, Penal Code; and

(B) the defendant has been previously convicted of an offense:

(i) under Section 43.25 or 43.26, Penal Code, or an offense under Section 43.23, Penal Code, punishable under Subsection (h) of that section;

(ii) under Section 20A.02(a)(7) or (8), 21.02, 21.11, 22.011, 22.021, or 25.02, Penal Code;

(iii) under Section 20.04(a)(4), Penal Code, if the defendant committed the offense with the intent to violate or abuse the victim sexually;

(iv) under Section 30.02, Penal Code, punishable under Subsection (d) of that section, if the defendant committed the offense with the intent to commit a felony described by Subparagraph (ii) or (iii); or

(v) under the laws of another state containing elements that are substantially similar to the elements of an offense listed in Subparagraph (i), (ii), (iii), or (iv).

(3) Notwithstanding Subdivision (1) or (2), a defendant shall be punished for a capital felony if it is shown on the trial of an offense under Section 22.021 otherwise punishable under Subsection (f) of that section that the defendant has previously been finally convicted of:

(A) an offense under Section 22.021 that was committed against a victim described by Section 22.021(f)(1) or was committed against a victim described by Section 22.021(f)(2) and in a manner described by Section 22.021(a)(2)(A); or

(B) an offense that was committed under the laws of another state that:

(i) contains elements that are substantially similar to the elements of an offense under Section 22.021; and

(ii) was committed against a victim described by Section 22.021(f)(1) or was committed against a victim described by Section 22.021(f)(2) and in a manner substantially similar to a manner described by Section 22.021(a)(2)(A).

(4) Notwithstanding Subdivision (1) or (2), and except as provided by Subdivision (3) for the trial of an offense under Section 22.021 as described by that subdivision, a defendant shall be punished by imprisonment in the Texas Department of Criminal Justice for life without parole if it is shown on the trial of an offense under Section 20A.03 or of a sexually violent offense, committed by the defendant on or after the defendant's 18th birthday, that the defendant has previously been finally convicted of:

(A) an offense under Section 20A.03 or of a sexually violent offense; or

(B) an offense that was committed under the laws of another state and that contains elements that are substantially similar to the elements of an offense under Section 20A.03 or of a sexually violent offense.

(5) A previous conviction for a state jail felony punishable under Section 12.35(a) may not be used for enhancement purposes under Subdivision (2).

(d) Except as provided by Subsection (c)(2) or (c)(4), if it is shown on the trial of a felony offense other than a state jail felony punishable under Section 12.35(a) that the defendant has previously been finally convicted of two felony offenses, and the second previous felony conviction is for an offense that occurred subsequent to the first previous conviction having become final, on conviction the defendant shall be punished by imprisonment in the Texas Department of Criminal Justice for life, or for any term of not more than 99 years or less than 25 years. A previous conviction for a state jail felony punishable under Section 12.35(a) may not be used for enhancement purposes under this subsection.

(e) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 834, Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2011.

(f) For the purposes of Subsections (a), (b), and (c)(1), an adjudication by a juvenile court under Section 54.03, Family Code, that a child engaged in delinquent conduct on or after January 1, 1996, constituting a felony offense for which the child is committed to the Texas Juvenile Justice Department under Section 54.04(d)(2), (d)(3), or (m), Family Code, or Section 54.05(f), Family Code, or to a post-adjudication secure correctional facility under Section 54.04011, Family Code, is a final felony conviction.

(g) For the purposes of Subsection (c)(2):

(1) a defendant has been previously convicted of an offense listed under Subsection (c)(2)(B) if the defendant was adjudged guilty of the offense or entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere in return for a grant of deferred adjudication, regardless of whether the sentence for the offense was ever imposed or whether the sentence was probated and the defendant was subsequently discharged from community supervision; and

(2) a conviction under the laws of another state for an offense containing elements that are substantially similar to the elements of an offense listed under Subsection (c)(2)(B) is a conviction of an offense listed under Subsection (c)(2)(B).

(h) In this section, "sexually violent offense" means an offense:

(1) described by Article 62.001(6), Code of Criminal Procedure; and

(2) for which an affirmative finding has been entered under Article 42.015(b) or 42A.105(a), Code of Criminal Procedure, for an offense other than an offense under Section 21.02 or 22.021.

Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 883, ch. 399, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1974. Amended by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 1750, ch. 339, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1983; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 582, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 900, Sec. 1.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1994; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 250, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 262, Sec. 78, eff. Jan. 1, 1996; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 318, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1996; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 665, Sec. 1, 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 667, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 15.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 283, Sec. 53, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1005, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 340 (S.B. 75), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 340 (S.B. 75), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 340 (S.B. 75), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 340 (S.B. 75), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 593 (H.B. 8), Sec. 1.14, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 593 (H.B. 8), Sec. 1.15, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 25.150, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 24), Sec. 6.02, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 122 (H.B. 3000), Sec. 14, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 834 (H.B. 3384), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 834 (H.B. 3384), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 834 (H.B. 3384), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 834 (H.B. 3384), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 834 (H.B. 3384), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1119 (H.B. 3), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1119 (H.B. 3), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 16.003, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 663 (H.B. 1302), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 663 (H.B. 1302), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 663 (H.B. 1302), Sec. 9, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1323 (S.B. 511), Sec. 11, eff. December 1, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 770 (H.B. 2299), Sec. 2.82, eff. January 1, 2017.

Sec. 12.425. PENALTIES FOR REPEAT AND HABITUAL FELONY OFFENDERS ON TRIAL FOR STATE JAIL FELONY. (a) If it is shown on the trial of a state jail felony punishable under Section 12.35(a) that the defendant has previously been finally convicted of two state jail felonies punishable under Section 12.35(a), on conviction the defendant shall be punished for a felony of the third degree.

(b) If it is shown on the trial of a state jail felony punishable under Section 12.35(a) that the defendant has previously been finally convicted of two felonies other than a state jail felony punishable under Section 12.35(a), and the second previous felony conviction is for an offense that occurred subsequent to the first previous conviction having become final, on conviction the defendant shall be punished for a felony of the second degree.

(c) If it is shown on the trial of a state jail felony for which punishment may be enhanced under Section 12.35(c) that the defendant has previously been finally convicted of a felony other than a state jail felony punishable under Section 12.35(a), on conviction the defendant shall be punished for a felony of the second degree.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 834 (H.B. 3384), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 12.43. PENALTIES FOR REPEAT AND HABITUAL MISDEMEANOR OFFENDERS. (a) If it is shown on the trial of a Class A misdemeanor that the defendant has been before convicted of a Class A misdemeanor or any degree of felony, on conviction he shall be punished by:

(1) a fine not to exceed $4,000;

(2) confinement in jail for any term of not more than one year or less than 90 days; or

(3) both such fine and confinement.

(b) If it is shown on the trial of a Class B misdemeanor that the defendant has been before convicted of a Class A or Class B misdemeanor or any degree of felony, on conviction he shall be punished by:

(1) a fine not to exceed $2,000;

(2) confinement in jail for any term of not more than 180 days or less than 30 days; or

(3) both such fine and confinement.

(c) If it is shown on the trial of an offense punishable as a Class C misdemeanor under Section 42.01 or 49.02 that the defendant has been before convicted under either of those sections three times or three times for any combination of those offenses and each prior offense was committed in the 24 months preceding the date of commission of the instant offense, the defendant shall be punished by:

(1) a fine not to exceed $2,000;

(2) confinement in jail for a term not to exceed 180 days; or

(3) both such fine and confinement.

(d) If the punishment scheme for an offense contains a specific enhancement provision increasing punishment for a defendant who has previously been convicted of the offense, the specific enhancement provision controls over this section.

Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 883, ch. 399, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1974. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 900, Sec. 1.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1994; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 318, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 564, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 12.44. REDUCTION OF STATE JAIL FELONY PUNISHMENT TO MISDEMEANOR PUNISHMENT. (a) A court may punish a defendant who is convicted of a state jail felony by imposing the confinement permissible as punishment for a Class A misdemeanor if, after considering the gravity and circumstances of the felony committed and the history, character, and rehabilitative needs of the defendant, the court finds that such punishment would best serve the ends of justice.

(b) At the request of the prosecuting attorney, the court may authorize the prosecuting attorney to prosecute a state jail felony as a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 883, ch. 399, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1974. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 785, Sec. 4.02, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 900, Sec. 1.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1994; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 318, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1276 (H.B. 2296), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 12.45. ADMISSION OF UNADJUDICATED OFFENSE. (a) A person may, with the consent of the attorney for the state, admit during the sentencing hearing his guilt of one or more unadjudicated offenses and request the court to take each into account in determining sentence for the offense or offenses of which he stands adjudged guilty.

(b) Before a court may take into account an admitted offense over which exclusive venue lies in another county or district, the court must obtain permission from the prosecuting attorney with jurisdiction over the offense.

(c) If a court lawfully takes into account an admitted offense, prosecution is barred for that offense.

Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 883, ch. 399, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1974. Amended by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 4131, ch. 649, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1983; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 900, Sec. 1.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1994.

Sec. 12.46. USE OF PRIOR CONVICTIONS. The use of a conviction for enhancement purposes shall not preclude the subsequent use of such conviction for enhancement purposes.

Added by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 1027, ch. 459, Sec. 1, eff. June 7, 1979. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 900, Sec. 1.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1994.

Sec. 12.47. PENALTY IF OFFENSE COMMITTED BECAUSE OF BIAS OR PREJUDICE. (a) If an affirmative finding under Article 42.014, Code of Criminal Procedure, is made in the trial of an offense other than a first degree felony or a Class A misdemeanor, the punishment for the offense is increased to the punishment prescribed for the next highest category of offense. If the offense is a Class A misdemeanor, the minimum term of confinement for the offense is increased to 180 days. This section does not apply to the trial of an offense of injury to a disabled individual under Section 22.04, if the affirmative finding in the case under Article 42.014, Code of Criminal Procedure, shows that the defendant intentionally selected the victim because the victim was disabled.

(b) The attorney general, if requested to do so by a prosecuting attorney, may assist the prosecuting attorney in the investigation or prosecution of an offense committed because of bias or prejudice. The attorney general shall designate one individual in the division of the attorney general's office that assists in the prosecution of criminal cases to coordinate responses to requests made under this subsection.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 987, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 751, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 85, Sec. 1.01, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 12.48. CERTAIN OFFENSES RESULTING IN LOSS TO NURSING AND CONVALESCENT HOMES. If it is shown on the trial of an offense under Chapter 31 or 32 that, as a result of a loss incurred because of the conduct charged, a trustee was appointed and emergency assistance funds, other than funds used to pay the expenses of the trustee, were used for a nursing or convalescent home under Subchapter D, Chapter 242, Health and Safety Code, the punishment for the offense is increased to the punishment prescribed for the next higher category of offense except that a felony of the first degree is punished as a felony of the first degree.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 439, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 12.49. PENALTY IF CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE USED TO COMMIT OFFENSE. If the court makes an affirmative finding under Article 42.012, Code of Criminal Procedure, in the punishment phase of the trial of an offense under Chapter 29, Chapter 31, or Title 5, other than a first degree felony or a Class A misdemeanor, the punishment for the offense is increased to the punishment prescribed for the next highest category of offense. If the offense is a Class A misdemeanor, the minimum term of confinement for the offense is increased to 180 days.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 417, Sec. 2(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Renumbered from Penal Code Sec. 12.48 and amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(93), 21.002(15), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 12.50. PENALTY IF OFFENSE COMMITTED IN DISASTER AREA OR EVACUATED AREA. (a) Subject to Subsections (c) and (d), the punishment for an offense described by Subsection (b) is increased to the punishment prescribed for the next higher category of offense if it is shown on the trial of the offense that the offense was committed in an area that was, at the time of the offense:

(1) subject to a declaration of a state of disaster made by:

(A) the president of the United States under the Robert T. Stafford Disaster Relief and Emergency Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Section 5121 et seq.);

(B) the governor under Section 418.014, Government Code; or

(C) the presiding officer of the governing body of a political subdivision under Section 418.108, Government Code; or

(2) subject to an emergency evacuation order.

(b) The increase in punishment authorized by this section applies only to an offense under:

(1) Section 20.05;

(2) Section 20.06;

(3) Section 20.07;

(4) Section 22.01;

(5) Section 28.02;

(6) Section 29.02;

(7) Section 30.02;

(8) Section 30.03;

(9) Section 30.04;

(10) Section 30.05; and

(11) Section 31.03.

(c) If an offense listed under Subsection (b) is punishable as a Class A misdemeanor, the minimum term of confinement for the offense is increased to 180 days. Except as provided by Subsection (d), if an offense listed under Subsection (b) is punishable as a felony of the first degree, the punishment for that offense may not be increased under this section.

(d) Except as otherwise provided by this subsection, the minimum term of imprisonment for an offense listed under Subsection (b)(1), (2), or (3) for which punishment is increased under this section is 10 years. If an offense listed under Subsection (b)(1) or (2) is punishable as a felony of the first degree, the minimum term of imprisonment is increased to 15 years unless another provision of law applicable to the offense provides for a minimum term of imprisonment of 15 years or more.

(e) For purposes of this section, "emergency evacuation order" means an official statement issued by the governing body of this state or a political subdivision of this state to recommend or require the evacuation of all or part of the population of an area stricken or threatened with a disaster.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 731 (S.B. 359), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 418 (S.B. 201), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 418 (S.B. 201), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1058 (H.B. 1028), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1058 (H.B. 1028), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 16.001, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 4), Sec. 2, eff. February 6, 2024.

Sec. 12.501. PENALTY FOR CERTAIN OFFENSES COMMITTED IN RETALIATION FOR OR ON ACCOUNT OF PERSON'S SERVICE OR STATUS AS PUBLIC SERVANT. (a) In this section, "public servant" has the meaning assigned by Section 36.06.

(b) Subject to Subsection (d), the punishment for an offense described by Subsection (c) is increased to the punishment prescribed for the next higher category of offense if it is shown on the trial of the offense that:

(1) the offense:

(A) was committed against a person the actor knows is a public servant or a member of a public servant's family or household; or

(B) involves property that the actor knows belongs to, is under the control of, or is lawfully possessed by a public servant; and

(2) the offense was committed in retaliation for or on account of the service or status of the person as a public servant.

(c) The increase in punishment authorized by this section applies only to:

(1) an offense under Section 21.16, 21.18, 21.19, 22.011, 28.02, 28.03, 30.05, 33.02, 42.07, or 42.072; or

(2) an offense under Section 32.51, other than an offense punishable under Subsection (c-1) of that section.

(d) If an offense described by Subsection (c) is punishable as a Class A misdemeanor, the minimum term of confinement for the offense is increased to 180 days. If an offense described by Subsection (c) is punishable as a felony of the first degree, the punishment for that offense may not be increased under this section.

(e) For purposes of this section, "member of a public servant's family" means a person related to the public servant within the second degree of consanguinity.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 791 (H.B. 624), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 12.502. PENALTY IF OFFENSE COMMITTED ON PREMISES OF POSTSECONDARY EDUCATIONAL INSTITUTION. (a) In this section:

(1) "Postsecondary educational institution" means:

(A) an institution of higher education or a private or independent institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003, Education Code; or

(B) a career school or college as defined by Section 132.001, Education Code.

(2) "Premises" means real property and all buildings and appurtenances pertaining to the real property.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (c), if it is shown on the trial of an offense under Section 21.07, 21.08, 21.15, or 21.17 that the offense was committed in a location that was on the premises of a postsecondary educational institution, the category of punishment for the offense is increased to a higher category of offense as follows:

(1) a Class C misdemeanor is increased to a Class B misdemeanor;

(2) a Class B misdemeanor is increased to a Class A misdemeanor;

(3) a Class A misdemeanor is increased to a state jail felony; and

(4) a state jail felony is increased to a felony of the third degree.

(c) For an offense otherwise punishable under Subsection (b), if it is shown on the trial of the offense that the person has been previously convicted twice of an offense under Section 21.07, 21.08, 21.15, or 21.17 for which the punishment was increased under Subsection (b), the category of punishment for the offense is increased to a higher category of offense as follows:

(1) a Class C misdemeanor is increased to a Class A misdemeanor;

(2) a Class B misdemeanor is increased to a state jail felony;

(3) a Class A misdemeanor is increased to a felony of the third degree; and

(4) a state jail felony is increased to a felony of the second degree.

(d) If the punishment scheme for an offense under Section 21.07, 21.08, 21.15, or 21.17 contains a specific enhancement provision increasing punishment to a higher minimum term of punishment than the minimum term required by the applicable higher category of offense prescribed by Subsection (b) or (c), the specific enhancement provision controls over this section.

(e) A previous conviction may be used for purposes of enhancement under this section or under another provision of Subchapter D, Chapter 12, but not under both this section and the other provision.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 451 (H.B. 3553), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER E. CORPORATIONS AND ASSOCIATIONS

Sec. 12.51. AUTHORIZED PUNISHMENTS FOR CORPORATIONS, ASSOCIATIONS, LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANIES, AND OTHER BUSINESS ENTITIES. (a) If a corporation, an association, a limited liability company, or another business entity is adjudged guilty of an offense that provides a penalty consisting of a fine only, a court may sentence the corporation, association, limited liability company, or other business entity to pay a fine in an amount fixed by the court, not to exceed the fine provided by the offense.

(b) If a corporation, an association, a limited liability company, or another business entity is adjudged guilty of an offense that provides a penalty including imprisonment, or that provides no specific penalty, a court may sentence the corporation, association, limited liability company, or other business entity to pay a fine in an amount fixed by the court, not to exceed:

(1) $20,000 if the offense is a felony of any category;

(2) $10,000 if the offense is a Class A or Class B misdemeanor;

(3) $2,000 if the offense is a Class C misdemeanor; or

(4) $50,000 if, as a result of an offense classified as a felony or Class A misdemeanor, an individual suffers serious bodily injury or death.

(c) In lieu of the fines authorized by Subsections (a), (b)(1), (b)(2), and (b)(4), if a court finds that the corporation, association, limited liability company, or other business entity gained money or property or caused personal injury or death, property damage, or other loss through the commission of a felony or Class A or Class B misdemeanor, the court may sentence the corporation, association, limited liability company, or other business entity to pay a fine in an amount fixed by the court, not to exceed double the amount gained or caused by the corporation, association, limited liability company, or business entity to be lost or damaged, whichever is greater.

(d) In addition to any sentence that may be imposed by this section, a corporation, an association, a limited liability company, or another business entity that has been adjudged guilty of an offense may be ordered by the court to give notice of the conviction to any person the court deems appropriate.

(e) On conviction of a corporation, an association, a limited liability company, or another business entity, the court shall notify the attorney general of that fact.

(f) In this section, "business entity" has the meaning assigned by Section 7.21.

Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 883, ch. 399, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1974. Amended by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 1917, ch. 768, Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 1977; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 1085, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 900, Sec. 1.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1994.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1258), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2019.